src/fst/morphology/stems/telephone.lexc
!! Lexica for recognising telephone numbers.
!! Language independent, if you need to compound or inflect telephone
!! numbers, create a language specific version.


LEXICON telephones

+       countrycodes    ;   ! +358 050 ...
%0%0    countrycodes    ;   ! 00358 050 ...
%0%0%   countrycodes    ;   ! 00 358 ...
0       areacodes       ;   ! 050 ...
tel%:   tel-URL         ;   ! tel:+358-50-55555555 in URL standard RFC 3966


LEXICON tel-URL

< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%-]* > telephoneURLTags ;

LEXICON countrycodes

< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] ([%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]) ([%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]) ([% | %-]) > areacodes ; ! 1-999 (kind of)

LEXICON areacodes

< %( %0 %) [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^2,4 ([% | %-]) > localcodes   ;   ! (0)50
< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^2,5 ([% | %-]) > localcodes ;   ! 050, 921

LEXICON localcodes

< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|% |%-]* [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]  > telephoneNumTags ;  ! e.g. 12 34 56 78, 123-45-678

LEXICON telephoneNumTags

+Num+Arab+Use/Circ+TEL:0    telephoneNumInflections    ;

LEXICON telephoneURLTags

+URL+TEL:0      telephoneURLInflections ;
